Utah statutes.
4-16-11.   Distributors of seed to keep record of each lot of seed distributed.

(1)  Each person whose name appears on the label of agricultural, vegetable, flower, or tree and shrub seeds or seeds for sprouting shall keep a complete record of each lot of agricultural, vegetable, flower, tree and shrub seed or seeds for sprouting distributed in this state for a period of two years and a file sample of each lot of seed for a period of one year after final disposition of the lot.

(2)  The records and samples pertaining to the distribution of the seeds shall be available to the department for inspection during regular business hours.

